Idaho, session 2025, H0094.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 4, Title 34, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 34-402A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
34-402A. ONLY CITIZENS SHALL VOTE. (1) It is unlawful for any individ-
ual who is not a citizen of the United States to vote in any and all public
elections on any and all matters. This includes but is not limited to any
primary election, general election, election for federal office, election
for state office, election for local office, and any public election that in-
cludes voting on constitutional amendments, ballot initiatives, or refer-
enda.
(2) Only a citizen of the United States shall be registered to vote in
Idaho. The secretary of state shall verify the citizenship status of all
persons on the statewide voter registration list by comparing the current
voter registrations with the citizenship data available from the Idaho
transportation department and the help America vote verification informa-
tion system maintained by the social security administration. The secretary
of state shall also make use of other available databases containing cit-
izenship status in order to ensure that only United States citizens are
registered to vote in Idaho.
(3) Any registrant in the statewide voter registration list whose sta-
tus as a United States citizen cannot be confirmed from a comparison with one
(1) or more state, multistate, or federal databases shall be removed from the
list of eligible voters. The individual shall be notified in writing of the
inability of the secretary of state to confirm the individual's citizenship
status and shall be provided the opportunity to present evidence or documen-
tary proof of citizenship to be restored to the eligible voter list.
(4) On and after July 1, 2025, before any voter registration applica-
tion is accepted and added to a county or statewide voter registration list,
the applicant's citizenship status must be confirmed through one (1) or more
of the databases described in subsection (2) of this section.
(5) Any willful violation of the provisions of subsection (1) of this
section shall constitute the crime of attempting to vote when not qualified
and be punishable pursuant to the provisions of section 18-2307, Idaho Code.


SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.